Utah statutes.
26-40-103.   Creation and administration of the Utah Children's Health
Insurance Program.
(1)  There is created the Utah Children's Health Insurance Program to be
administered by the department in accordance with the provisions of:
(a)  this chapter; and
(b)  the State Children's Health Insurance Program, 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397aa et
seq.
(2)  The department shall:
(a)  prepare and submit the state's children's health insurance plan before
May 1, 1998, and any amendments to the federal Department of Health and Human
Services in accordance with 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ff; and
(b)  make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative
Rulemaking Act regarding:
(i)  eligibility requirements consistent with Subsection 26-18-3(8);
(ii)  program benefits;
(iii)  the level of coverage for each program benefit;
(iv)  cost-sharing requirements for enrollees, which may not:
(A)  exceed the guidelines set forth in 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397ee; or
(B)  impose deductible, copayment, or coinsurance requirements on an enrollee
for well-child, well-baby, and immunizations; and
(v)  the administration of the program.
